Arkansas, session 2025, HB1582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-10-507(a)(2), concerning the
registration and reporting requirement for eligibility for benefits under the
Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Registration and Reporting. He or she has registered for
work at and thereafter continued to report to a Division of Workforce
Services office in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe,
and has created an account on the state-maintained job board listing his or
her work experience, credentials or licenses held or earned, and any relevant
job information. The director, by rule, may waive or alter either or both of
the requirements of this subdivision (a)(2) as to individuals attached to
regular jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect
to which he or she finds that compliance with these requirements would be
oppressive or would be inconsistent with the purpose of this chapter.
*CRH064*
03-17-2025 12:14:07 CRH064

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/17/25 HB1582
However, no such rules shall conflict with § 11-10-501;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-10-507(b), concerning required work
search contacts under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(3) of this section, the
division shall require at least five (5) work search contacts per week in
which an individual submits a claim for benefits.
(B) An individual submitting a claim for benefits shall
report to the division the five (5) work search contacts made during the week
required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section as part of the weekly
certification process.
(2)(A)(i) The state-maintained job board shall match open jobs
posted on the state-maintained job board with an individual submitting a
claim for benefits.
(ii) As used in this section, "match" means that the
qualifications of the individual correspond to at least seventy-five percent
(75%) of the requirements of the open job, as calculated by the state-
maintained job board.
(B)(i) An individual who matches with five (5) or more
open jobs on the state-maintained job board is encouraged to apply to the top
ranked five (5) open jobs to meet the requirements of his or her work search
contacts under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(ii) An individual who matches with fewer than five
(5) open jobs is encouraged to apply to those matching open jobs as well as
any other open jobs on the state-maintained job board to meet the
requirements of his or her work search contacts under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section.
(3) If an individual fails to complete and report the number of
work search contacts required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section during
a week in which he or she submits a claim for benefits, the individual is not
eligible for benefits for that week.
(3)(4) The division shall audit at least one hundred (100) of
all weekly work search reports for work search verification each week.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after January
03-17-2025 12:14:07 CRH064

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 H3/17/25 HB1582
1, 2026.

/s/McAlindon

































03-17-2025 12:14:07 CRH064